Utah statutes.
17-21-12.   Recording procedures -- Endorsements of entry number required on
documents.
(1) When a document is accepted by the recorder's office for recording, the
recorder shall:
(a)  endorse upon the first page of the document an entry number and the time
when the document was accepted, noting the year, month, day, hour, and minute
of its reception, and the amount of fees for recording it; and
(b)  record the document during office hours in the order it was accepted.
(2)  Each county recorder shall place an entry number or a book and page
reference on each page of a document that the recorder accepts for recording
only if the original document or a copy of the document is kept as a public
record under Section 17-21-3.
(3) (a)  A county recorder may endorse each document that the recorder accepts
for recording with a book and page reference.
(b)  If a county recorder elects not to endorse a document with a book and
page reference, the book and page reference may be omitted:
(i)  in each index required by statute; and
(ii)  on each document presented for recording that is required to recite
recording data.
(4)  Subject to Section 17-21-3, the county recorder shall return the document
to the person that the recorder considers appropriate.
